District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.03

Number and election of directors.

(a)

A board of directors shall consist of one or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(b)

The number of directors may be increased or decreased by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

(c)

Directors shall be elected at the 1st annual shareholders’ meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter unless their terms are staggered under § 29-306.06.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720